Hawaii, session 2026, HB2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. (a) The state auditor, in collaboration with the office of the city auditor for the city and county of Honolulu, shall conduct a financial audit of all state and city and county of Honolulu expenditures on programs addressing homelessness within the city and county of Honolulu during the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 fiscal years. (b)  The state auditor and office of the city auditor shall coordinate data collection, methodology, and reporting. (c)  The audit shall include: (1)  Total expenditures by program and agency; (2)  Program outcomes, to the extent data is available; (3)  The number of homeless individuals served by each program; and (4)  Calculations of total spending per homeless individual served. (d)  The state auditor and office of the city auditor shall submit a single consolidated report of their findings and recommendations to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $        or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the audit of homelessness program expenditures required by this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________